District of Columbia statutes.
4-1302.05

Notification of persons identified in a report.

(a)

The staff which maintains the Child Protection Register shall, within 7 days from the date that a report is entered in said Register, give notice to each person identified in the report of the fact that the report identifies him or her as responsible for the alleged abuse or neglect of the child who is the subject of the report.

(b)

This notice shall include the following information:

(1)

The date that the report identifying the person was entered in the Child Protection Register;

(2)

The right of the person to review the entire report, except information which identifies other persons mentioned in the report; and

(3)

The administrative procedures through which the person may seek to correct information which he or she alleges is incorrect or to establish that the report is unfounded.

History

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title II, § 205, 24 DCR 3341
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-206, § 2(j), 49 DCR 7815

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-2115.
1973 Ed., § 6-2115.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-206 rewrote subsec. (b)(3) which had read as follows: “(3) The administrative procedures through which the person may seek the correction of information which he or she alleges is incorrect.”

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(b) of Improved Child Abuse Investigations Technical Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-240, March 25, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2753).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) delay of the applicability of provisions changing the manner in which the Child and Family Services Agency will process reports of child abuse and neglect, see § 3 of Improved Child Abuse Investigations Technical Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-494, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 9781).
For temporary (90 day) delay of the applicability of provisions changing the manner in which the Child and Family Services Agency will process reports of child abuse and neglect, see § 3 of Improved Child Abuse Investigations Technical Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-603, January 7, 2003, 50 DCR 687).

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 14-206: Section 16(b) of D.C. Law 14-310 provided that section 2(a)(2), (4), (5), (6), and (7), (b), (c), (d), (e), (h), (i), (j), (k), and (l) of D.C. Law 14-206 shall apply as of October 1, 2003.